Montana, session 2025, HB70.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Study of state fire suppression issues, methods, and costs. (1) The environmental
quality council provided for in 5-16-101 shall conduct a comprehensive fire suppression study.
(2) The study must include an investigation of:
(a) firefighting operations in Montana by the state and federal governments, including operations
on tribal land and private land, and the management policies affecting the success of those operations;
(b) the efficient use of fire suppression resources, including equipment and firefighters;
(c) the impact of operations on private land and the effective use of private resources to fight fires;
and
(d) state and federal forest management and grazing policies and how those policies may
potentially contribute to an increased affect the number of wildfires, great safety risk to firefighters, or
compromised effectiveness of fire suppression efforts.
(3) The environmental quality council shall complete the study by September 15, 2026, and report
its findings and recommendations, including legislation, to the 70th legislature.
Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $50,000 from the general fund to the legislative
services division for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to pay for costs associated with the study required
under [section 1.]
Section 3. Contingent voidness. (1) Pursuant to Joint Rule 40-65, if [this act] does not include an
appropriation prior to being transmitted to the governor, then [this act] is void.
(2) If the appropriation in [section 2] is vetoed, then [this act] is void.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 70
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 70
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 5. Termination. [This act] terminates December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 70
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 70, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 70
INTRODUCED BY S. GIST
BY REQUEST OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY COUNCIL
AN ACT REQUIRING A STUDY OF STATE FIRE SUPPRESSION ISSUES, METHODS, AND COSTS;
PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; ESTABLISHING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; PROVIDING FOR
CONTINGENT VOIDNESS; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION
DATE.”